Utah statutes.
10-9a-508.   Exactions -- Exaction for water interest -- Requirement to offer to original owner property acquired by exaction.

(1)  A municipality may impose an exaction or exactions on development proposed in a land use application, including, subject to Subsection (3), an exaction for a water interest, if:

(a)  an essential link exists between a legitimate governmental interest and each exaction; and

(b)  each exaction is roughly proportionate, both in nature and extent, to the impact of the proposed development.

(2)  If a land use authority imposes an exaction for another governmental entity:

(a)  the governmental entity shall request the exaction; and

(b)  the land use authority shall transfer the exaction to the governmental entity for which it was exacted.

(3) (a) (i)  A municipality shall base any exaction for a water interest on the culinary water authority's established calculations of projected water interest requirements.

(ii)  Upon an applicant's request, the culinary water authority shall provide the applicant with the basis for the culinary water authority's calculations under Subsection (3)(a)(i) on which an exaction for a water interest is based.

(b)  A municipality may not impose an exaction for a water interest if the culinary water authority's existing available water interests exceed the water interests needed to meet the reasonable future water requirement of the public, as determined under Subsection 73-1-4(2)(f).

(4) (a)  If a municipality plans to dispose of surplus real property that was acquired under this section and has been owned by the municipality for less than 15 years, the municipality shall first offer to reconvey the property, without receiving additional consideration, to the person who granted the property to the municipality.

(b)  A person to whom a municipality offers to reconvey property under Subsection (4)(a) has 90 days to accept or reject the municipality's offer.

(c)  If a person to whom a municipality offers to reconvey property declines the offer, the municipality may offer the property for sale.

(d)  Subsection (4)(a) does not apply to the disposal of property acquired by exaction by a community development and renewal agency.



Amended by Chapter 309, 2013 General Session

